District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.92

Eligibility requirements.

(a)

An applicant to be an apprentice electrician shall be registered by the Mayor, without examination, upon providing such information as may be required by the Board of Industrial Trades and payment of appropriate fees. An apprentice electrician shall work only under the direct personal supervision and control of a licensed master electrician or licensed master electrician specialist.

(b)

Except as provided in subsection (b-1) of this subsection, an applicant for licensure as a journeyman electrician or a master electrician limited (low voltage) shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board of Industrial Trades that he or she has satisfactorily completed a class on Title 12C of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations or equivalent code within 2 years prior to submittal of the application and has:

(1)

Worked as an apprentice electrician for at least 8,000 hours over at least 4 years;

(2)

Graduated from an accredited college or university with a degree in electrical engineering, and has at least 2 years of practical experience in electrical work, which has been certified by a licensed master electrician; or

(3)

Has comparable experience or a combination of education and experience that the Board deems equivalent to the above; and

(4)

Has supplied any additional evidence as the Board determines is necessary for the particular specialty license sought by the applicant.

(b-1)

(1)

The Board shall accept, in lieu of examination and the requirements set forth in subsection (b) of this section, a certificate from a national certifying organization certifying that the applicant for licensure as a journeyman electrician:

(A)

Has passed the organization’s required examination;

(B)

Is designated by the organization as a journeyman electrician; and

(C)

Has not been disciplined or otherwise disqualified by the organization.

(2)

For the purposes of this subsection, the term “national certifying organization” shall include a nationally recognized trade organization or labor union.

(c)

An applicant for licensure as a master electrician shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board that the applicant has met the requirements of subsection (b) of this section and in addition has worked as a journeyman electrician for at least 4 years.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2151(e), 57 DCR 181
Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-82, § 2(b), 58 DCR 11022

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-2853.12.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.92.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-111 rewrote the lead-in text of subsec. (b), which had read as follows: “(b) An applicant for licensure as a journeyman electrician, a master electrician limited (low voltage), or a master electrician limited (elevator/escalator), shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board of Industrial Trades that he or she has satisfactorily completed a class on the National Electrical Code within two years prior to submittal of the application and has:”.
D.C. Law 19-82, in subsec. (b), substituted “Except as provided in subsection (b-1) of this subsection, an” for “An”; and added subsec. (b-1).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2151(e) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2151(e) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).